Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska49-1438
Person, defined.

Person shall mean a business, individual, proprietorship, firm, partnership, limited liability company, joint venture, syndicate, business trust, labor organization, company, corporation, association, committee, or other organization or group of persons acting jointly.

Laws 1976, LB 987, § 38;

Laws 1993, LB 121, § 306.